District of Columbia statutes.
29-306.07

Resignation of directors.

(a)

A director may resign at any time by delivering a written resignation to the board of directors, or its chair, or to the secretary of the corporation.

(b)

A resignation shall be effective when the resignation is delivered unless the resignation specifies a later effective date or an effective date determined upon the happening of an event or events. A resignation that is conditioned upon failing to receive a specified vote for election as a director may provide that it is irrevocable.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-306.10.